Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.06.060

Abandonment—Reorganization under plan adopted—Effective date.

If a majority of votes cast at the election favor abandonment of the general plan of government under which the noncharter code city is then organized and reorganization under the different general plan proposed in the resolution or petition, the officers to be elected shall be those prescribed by the plan of government so adopted, and they shall be elected as provided in RCW 35A.06.030. If the city is adopting a plan of government other than those authorized under this title, the officers shall be elected at the next succeeding general municipal election. Upon the election, qualification, and assumption of office by such officers the reorganization of the government of such municipality shall be complete and such municipality shall thereafter be governed under such plan. If the plan so adopted is not a plan authorized for noncharter code cities, upon the election, qualification, and assumption of office by such officers the municipality shall cease to be a noncharter code city governed under the provisions of this optional municipal code and shall revert to the classification selected and shall be governed by the general laws relating to municipalities of such class with the powers conferred by law upon municipalities of such class. Such change of classification shall not affect the then existing property rights or liabilities of the municipal corporation.

[ 2001 c 33 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 16; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.06.060.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.